Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0584.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 703. (1) A person who that disburses pension or annuity payments , except as otherwise provided under this section, shall may withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 on the taxable part of payments from an employer pension, annuity, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or other deferred compensation plan as well as from an individual retirement arrangement, an annuity, an endowment, or a life insurance contract issued by a life insurance company. Withholding A person that withholds a tax as provided under this subsection is subject to the same requirements under this chapter as a person that is required to withhold a tax under this chapter. If a person withholds a tax under this subsection, the person shall be calculated calculate the withholding on the taxable disbursement after deducting from the taxable portion the same proportion of the total amount of personal and dependency exemptions of the individual allowed under this act. Withholding A person is not required to withhold a tax on any part of a distribution that is not expected to be includable in the recipient's gross income or that is deductible from adjusted gross income under section 30(1)(e) or (f). (2) Every employer in this state required under the provisions of the internal revenue code to withhold a tax on the compensation of an individual, except as otherwise provided, shall deduct and withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying, except as provided by subsection (14), (11), the rate prescribed in section 51 to the remainder of the compensation after deducting from compensation the same proportion of the total amount of personal and dependency exemptions of the individual allowed under this act that the period of time covered by the compensation is of 1 year. The department may prescribe withholding tables that may be used by employers to compute the amount of tax required to be withheld. (3) Except as otherwise provided under this section, for tax years that begin before July 1, 2016, every flow-through entity in this state shall withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 to the distributive share of taxable income reasonably expected to accrue after allocation and apportionment under chapter 3 of each nonresident member who is an individual after deducting from that distributive income the same proportion of the total amount of personal and dependency exemptions of the individual allowed under this act. All of the taxes withheld under this section shall accrue to the state on April 15, July 15, and October 15 of the flow-through entity's tax year and January 15 of the following year, except a flow-through entity that is not on a calendar year basis shall substitute the appropriate due dates in the flow-through entity's fiscal year that correspond to those in a calendar year. Withholding for each period shall be equal to 1/4 of the total withholding calculated on the distributive share that is reasonably expected to accrue during the tax year of the flow-through entity. (4) Except as otherwise provided under this section, for tax years that begin before July 1, 2016, every flow-through entity with business activity in this state that has more than $200,000.00 of business income reasonably expected to accrue in the tax year after allocation or apportionment shall withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 623 to the distributive share of the business income of each member that is a corporation or that is a flow-through entity. For purposes of calculating the $200,000.00 withholding threshold, the business income of a flow-through entity shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying the business income by the sales factor of the flow-through entity. The sales factor of the flow-through entity is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total sales of the flow-through entity in this state during the tax year and the denominator of which is the total sales of the flow-through entity everywhere during the tax year. As used in this subsection, "business income" means that term as defined in section 603(2). For a partnership or S corporation, business income includes payments and items of income and expense that are attributable to business activity of the partnership or S corporation and separately reported to the members. As used in this subsection, "sales" means that term as defined in section 609 and sales in this state is determined as provided in sections 665 and 669. All of the taxes withheld under this section shall accrue to the state on April 15, July 15, and October 15 of the flow-through entity's tax year and January 15 of the following year, except a flow-through entity that is not on a calendar year basis shall substitute the appropriate due dates in the flow-through entity's fiscal year that correspond to those in a calendar year. Withholding for each period shall be equal to 1/4 of the total withholding calculated on the distributive share of business income that is reasonably expected to accrue during the tax year of the flow-through entity. (5) For tax years that begin before July 1, 2016, if a flow-through entity is subject to the withholding requirements of subsection (4), then a member of that flow-through entity that is itself a flow-through entity shall withhold a tax on the distributive share of business income as described in subsection (4) of each of its members. The department shall apply tax withheld by a flow-through entity on the distributive share of business income of a member flow-through entity to the withholding required of that member flow-through entity. All of the taxes withheld under this section shall accrue to the state on April 15, July 15, and October 15 of the flow-through entity's tax year and January 15 of the following year, except a flow-through entity that is not on a calendar year basis shall substitute the appropriate due dates in the flow-through entity's fiscal year that correspond to those in a calendar year. Withholding for each period shall be equal to 1/4 of the total withholding calculated on the distributive share of business income that is reasonably expected to accrue during the tax year of the flow-through entity. (3) (6) Every casino licensee shall withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 to the winnings of a nonresident reportable by the casino licensee under the internal revenue code. (4) (7) Every race meeting licensee or track licensee shall withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 to a payoff price on a winning ticket of a nonresident reportable by the race meeting licensee or track licensee under the internal revenue code that is the result of pari-mutuel wagering at a licensed race meeting. (5) (8) Every casino licensee or race meeting licensee or track licensee shall report winnings of a resident reportable by the casino licensee or race meeting licensee or track licensee under the internal revenue code to the department in the same manner and format as required under the internal revenue code. (6) (9) Every eligible production company shall, to the extent not withheld by a professional services corporation or professional employer organization, deduct and withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 to the remainder of the payments made to the professional services corporation or professional employer organization for the services of a performing artist or crew member after deducting from those payments the same proportion of the total amount of personal and dependency exemptions of the individuals allowed under this act. (7) (10) Every publicly traded partnership that has equity securities registered with the securities and exchange commission Securities and Exchange Commission under section 12 of title I of the securities and exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78l, shall not be subject to withholding. (8) (11) Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, all of the taxes withheld under this section shall accrue to the state on the last day of the month in which the taxes are withheld but shall be returned and paid to the department by the employer, eligible production company, casino licensee, or race meeting licensee or track licensee within 15 days after the end of any month or as provided in section 705. For an employer that has entered into an agreement with a community college pursuant to chapter 13 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.161 to 389.166, a portion of the taxes withheld under this section that are attributable to each employee in a new job created pursuant to the agreement shall accrue to the community college on the last day of the month in which the taxes are withheld but shall be returned and paid to the community college by the employer within 15 days after the end of any month or as provided in section 705 for as long as the agreement remains in effect. For purposes of this act and 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, payments made by an employer to a community college under this subsection shall be considered are income taxes paid to this state. (9) (12) A person required by this section to deduct and withhold taxes on income under this section holds the amount of tax withheld as a trustee for this state and is liable for the payment of the tax to this state or, if applicable, to the community college and is not liable to any individual for the amount of the payment. (10) (13) An employer in this state is not required to deduct and withhold a tax on the compensation paid to a nonresident individual employee, who, under section 256, may claim a tax credit equal to or in excess of the tax estimated to be due for the tax year or is exempted from liability for the tax imposed by this act. In each tax year, the nonresident individual shall furnish to the employer, on a form approved by the department, a verified statement of nonresidence. (11) (14) A person required to withhold a tax under this act, by the fifteenth day of the following month, shall provide the department with a copy of any exemption certificate on which a person with income subject to withholding under subsection (6) or (7) (3) or (4) claims more than 9 personal or dependency exemptions , or claims a status that exempts the person subject to withholding under subsection (6) or (7) (3) or (4) from withholding under this section. (12) (15) A person who that disburses annuity payments pursuant to the terms of a qualified charitable gift annuity is not required to deduct and withhold a tax on those payments. as prescribed under subsection (1). As used in this subsection, "qualified charitable gift annuity" means an annuity described under section 501(m)(5) of the internal revenue code and issued by an organization exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. (16) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (4) and (5), if a flow-through entity receives an exemption certificate from a member other than a nonresident individual, the flow-through entity shall not withhold a tax on the distributive share of the business income of that member if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The exemption certificate is completed by the member in the form and manner prescribed by the department and certifies that the member will do all of the following: (i) File the returns required under this act. (ii) Pay or withhold the tax required under this act on the distributive share of the business income received from any flow-through entity in which the member has an ownership or beneficial interest, directly or indirectly through 1 or more other flow-through entities. (iii) Submit to the taxing jurisdiction of this state for purposes of collection of the tax under this act together with related interest and penalties under 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, imposed on the member with respect to the distributive share of the business income of that member. (b) The department may require the member to file the exemption certificate with the department and provide a copy to the flow-through entity. (c) The department may require a flow-through entity that receives an exemption certificate to attach a copy of the exemption certificate to the annual reconciliation return as required by section 711. A flow-through entity that is entirely exempt from the withholding requirements of subsection (4) or (5) by this subsection may be required to furnish a copy of the exemption certificate in another manner prescribed by the department. (d) A copy of the exemption certificate shall be retained by the member and flow-through entity and made available to the department upon request. Any copy of the exemption certificate shall be maintained in a format and for the period required by 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31. (17) The department may revoke the election provided for in subsection (16) if it determines that the member or a flow-through entity is not abiding by the terms of the exemption certificate or the requirements of subsection (16). If the department does revoke the election option under subsection (16), the department shall notify the affected flow-through entity that withholding is required on the member under subsection (4) or (5), beginning 60 days after notice of revocation is received. (18) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (4) and (5), a flow-through entity is not required to withhold in accordance with this section for a member that voluntarily elects to file a return and pay the tax imposed by the Michigan business tax act under section 680 or section 500 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1500. (19) Notwithstanding the withholding requirements of subsection (3), (4), or (5), a flow-through entity is not required to comply with those withholding requirements to the extent that the withholding would violate any of the following: (a) Housing assistance payment programs distribution restrictions under 24 CFR part 880, 881, 883, or 891. (b) Rural housing service return on investment restrictions under 7 CFR 3560.68 or 3560.305. (c) Articles of incorporation or other document of organization adopted pursuant to section 83 or 93 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1483 and 125.1493. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2026.